Utah statutes.
48-3a-304.   Liability of members and managers.

(1)  A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited liability company is solely the debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability company.  A member or manager is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability company solely by reason of being or acting as a member or manager.  This Subsection (1) applies regardless of the dissolution of the limited liability company.

(2)  The failure of a limited liability company to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not a ground for imposing liability on a member or manager of the limited liability company for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability company.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

